cs: Aplikace sanitárního základního nátěru: Kování; Trubky; Jiné
it: Applicazione di primer idraulico: Raccordi; Tubi; Altro
pt-BR: Aplicação de primer para encanamento: Encaixes; Tubos; Outro
zh-TW: 管道底漆應用: 配件; 管道; 其他
vi: Ứng dụng sơn lót hệ thống ống nước: Phụ kiện; Ống; Khác
ko: 배관 프라이머 도포: 피팅; 파이프; 기타
sl-SI: Nanos temeljnega premaza za vodovodne instalacije: Armature; Cevi; Drugo
bg-BG: Нанасяне на водопроводен грунд: Фитинги; Тръби; Други
fr: Application d’un apprêt de plomberie: Raccords; Tuyaux; Autre
sv: Applicering av primer för rörledningar: Beslag; Rör; Övrigt
nb: Påføring av VVS-primer: Beslag; Rør; Annet
lt-LT: Santechnikos grunto paskirtis: Jungliai; Vamzdžiai; Kita
da: Påføring af VVS-primer: Beslag; Rør; Andet
de: Anwendung der Sanitärgrundierung: Anpassungen; Rohre; Sonstiges
pl: Zastosowanie podkładu pod hydraulikę: Okucia; Orurowanie; Inne
ru: Нанесение сантехнического праймера: Фитинги; Трубы; Другой
nl: Toepassing loodgietersprimer: Uitrusting; Pijpen; Andere
hr-HR: Primjena temeljnog premaza za vodovodne instalacije: Priključci; Cijevi; Ostalo
ro-RO: Utilizările grundului pentru instalații sanitare: Racorduri; Țevi; Altele
hu: Vízvezeték-alapozó alkalmazása: Szerelvények; Csövek; Egyéb
fi: Putkiston pohjusteen levittäminen: Kalusteet; Putket; Muu
ja: 配管用プライマーの用途: フィッティング; パイプ; その他
el: Εφαρμογή ασταριού υδραυλικών εγκαταστάσεων: Εξαρτήματα; Σωλήνες; Άλλο
en: Plumbing primer application: Fittings; Pipes; Other
zh-CN: 管道底漆应用: 配件; 管道; 其他
tr: Sıhhi tesisat astarı uygulaması: Bağlantı parçaları; Borular; Diğer
es: Aplicación de imprimador para fontanería: Accesorios; Pipas; Otros
th: การลงสีรองพื้นท่อประปา: ข้อต่อ; ท่อ; อื่นๆ
pt-PT: Aplicação de primer de canalização: Encaixes; Tubos; Outro
sk-SK: Aplikácia základného inštalatérskeho náteru: Kovanie; Rúry; Iné